zh-CN: 咖啡滤网尺寸: 圆盘型; 巨型; K 杯; 1 号; 10 号; 101 号; 102 号; 103 号; 104 号; 2 号; 4 号; 6 号; 8-D 号; 其他
cs: Velikost košíčku portafilteru: Diskové; Velkokapacitní; K-Cup; Č. 1; Č. 10; Č. 101; Č. 102; Č. 103; Č. 104; Č. 2; Č. 4; Č. 6; Č. 8-D; Jiné
pt-BR: Tamanho da cesta para filtros de café: Disco; Jumbo; Cápsula K; Nº 1; Nº 10; Nº 101; Nº 102; Nº 103; Nº 104; Nº 2; Nº 4; Nº 6; Nº 8-D; Outro
ru: Размер корзины для кофейного фильтра: Диск; Джамбо; K-Cup; № 1; № 10; № 101; № 102; № 103; № 104; № 2; № 4; № 6; № 8-D; Другой
sv: Storlek på kaffefilterkorg: Disk; Jumbo; K-Cup; Nr 1; No. 10; No. 10; No. 102; No. 103; No. 104; Nr 2; No. 4; No. 6; No. 8-D; Övrigt
es: Tamaño del filtro de café: Disco; Jumbo; K-Cup; N.º 1; N° 10; N° 101; N° 102; N° 103; N° 104; N.º 2; N° 4; N° 6; N.° 8-D; Otros
pt-PT: Tamanho do cesto do filtro de café: Disco; Jumbo; Cápsula K; N.º 1; N.º 10; N.º 101; N.º 102; N.º 103; N.º 104; N.º 2; N.º 4; N.º 6; N.º 8-D; Outro
sl-SI: Velikost košare za kavne filtre: Disk; Jumbo; K-Cup kapsula; Št. 1; Št. 10; Št. 101; Št. 102; Št. 103; Št. 104; Št. 2; Št. 4; Št. 6; Št. 8-D; Druga
th: ขนาดตะแกรงกรองกาแฟ: แผ่นกลมแบน; จัมโบ้; ขนาด K-Cup; เบอร์ 1; หมายเลข 10; หมายเลข 101; หมายเลข 102; หมายเลข 103; หมายเลข 104; เบอร์ 2; หมายเลข 4; หมายเลข 6; หมายเลข 8-D; อื่นๆ
nb: Kaffefilterholdertype: Disk; Jumbo; K-cup; Nr. 1; Nr. 10; Nr. 101; Nr. 102; Nr. 103; Nr. 104; Nr. 2; Nr. 4; Nr. 6; Nr. 8-D; Annet
tr: Kahve filtre sepeti boyutu: Disk; Jumbo boy; K-Cup; No. 1; No. 10; No. 101; No. 102; No. 103; No. 104; No. 2; No. 4; No. 6; No. 8-D; Diğer
ko: 커피 필터 바스켓 크기: 디스크; 점보; K컵; 1호; 10호; 101호; 102호; 103호; 104호; 2호; 4호; 6호; 8-D호; 기타
it: Dimensione del cestello per filtro da caffè: Disco; Jumbo; K-Cup; N. 1; Numero 10; Numero 101; Numero 102; Numero 103; Numero 104; N. 2; Numero 4; Numero 6; Numero 8-D; Altro
da: Kaffefilterkurvs størrelse: Skive; Jumbo; K-Cup; Nr. 1; Nr. 10; Nr. 101; Nr. 102; Nr. 103; Nr. 104; Nr. 2; Nr. 4; Nr. 6; Nr. 8-D; Andet
nl: Formaat koffiefilterhouder: Schijf; Jumbo; K-Cup; Nr. 1; Nr. 10; Nr. 101; Nr. 102; Nr. 103; Nr. 104; Nr. 2; Nr. 4; Nr. 6; Nr. 8-D; Overig
zh-TW: 咖啡濾杯尺寸: 碟形; 巨型; K-Cup 膠囊; 1 級; 第 10 號; 第 101 號; 第 102 號; 第 103 號; 第 104 號; 2 級; 第 4 號; 第 6 號; 第 8-D 號; 其他
sk-SK: Rozmery košíka na kávové filtre: Disk; Jumbo; K-Cup; č. 1; č. 10; č. 101; č. 102; č. 103; č. 104; č. 2; č. 4; č. 6; č. 8-D; Iné
hr-HR: Veličina filtar košarice za kavu: Disk; Jumbo; K-Cup; Br. 1; Br. 10; Br. 101; Br. 102; Br. 103; Br. 104; Br. 2; Br. 4; Br. 6; Br. 8-D; Ostalo
en: Coffee filter basket size: Disk; Jumbo; K-Cup; No. 1; No. 10; No. 101; No. 102; No. 103; No. 104; No. 2; No. 4; No. 6; No. 8-D; Other
vi: Kích thước giỏ lọc cà phê: Đĩa; Jumbo; Viên nén K-Cup; Số 1; Số 10; Số 101; Số 102; Số 103; Số 104; Số 2; Số 4; Số 6; Số 8-D; Khác
lt-LT: Kavos filtro krepšelio dydis: Diskinis; Jumbo dydžio; „K-Cup“ kapsulė; Nr. 1; Nr. 10; Nr. 101; Nr. 102; Nr. 103; Nr. 104; Nr. 2; Nr. 4; Nr. 6; Nr. 8-D; Kita
ro-RO: Dimensiunea coșului pentru filtrul de cafea: Disc; Jumbo; Cupă K; Nr. 1; Nr. 10; Nr. 101; Nr. 102; Nr. 103; Nr. 104; Nr. 2; Nr. 4; Nr. 6; Nr. 8-D; Altele
el: Μέγεθος καλαθιού φίλτρου καφέ: Δίσκος; Jumbo; K-Cup; Νο 1; Αρ. 10; Αρ. 101; Αρ. 102; Αρ. 103; Αρ. 104; Νο 2; Αρ. 4; Αρ. 6; Αρ. 8-D; Άλλο
fi: Kahvinsuodatinkorin koko: Levy; Jumbo; K-cup; Koko 1; Nro 10; Nro 101; Nro 102; Nro 103; Nro 104; Koko 2; Nro 4; Nro 6; Nro 8-D; Muu
hu: Kávéfilter kosár mérete: Tárcsa; Óriási; Kapszula; 1. számú; 10. sz.; 101. sz.; 102. sz.; 103. sz.; 104. sz.; 2. számú; 4. sz.; 6. sz.; 8-D sz.; Egyéb
bg-BG: Размер на кошницата за филтър за кафе: Диск; Много голямо; K-Cup; № 1; № 10; № 101; № 102; № 103; № 104; № 2; № 4; № 6; № 8-D; Друго
pl: Rozmiar uchwytu na filtr do kawy: Dysk; Jumbo; K-Cup; Nr 1; Nr 10; Nr 101; Nr 102; Nr 103; Nr 104; Nr 2; Nr 4; Nr 6; Nr 8-D; Pozostałe
de: Größe von Kaffeefilterkörben: Scheibe; Jumbo; K-Cup; Nr. 1; Nr. 10; Nr. 101; Nr. 102; Nr. 103; Nr. 104; Nr. 2; Nr. 4; Nr. 6; Nr. 8-D; Sonstiges
ja: コーヒーフィルターバスケットのサイズ: ディスク; ジャンボ; Kカップ; No. 1; No. 10; No. 101; No. 102; No. 103; No. 104; No. 2; No. 4; No. 6; No. 8-D; その他
fr: Taille du porte-filtre: Disque; Jumbo; K-Cup; N° 1; N° 10; N° 101; N° 102; N° 103; N° 104; N° 2; N° 4; N° 6; N° 8-D; Autre